Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 3. Vehicle Theft.

Sec. 11.46.360.
Vehicle theft in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of vehicle theft in the first degree if, having no right to do so or any reasonable ground to believe the person has such a right, the person drives, tows away, or takes

the car, truck, motorcycle, motor home, bus, aircraft, or watercraft of another;

the propelled vehicle of another and

the vehicle or any other property of another is damaged in a total amount of $750 or more;

the owner incurs reasonable expenses as a result of the loss of use of the vehicle, in a total amount of $750 or more; or

the owner is deprived of the use of the vehicle for seven days or more;

the propelled vehicle of another and the vehicle is marked as a police or emergency vehicle; or

the propelled vehicle of another and, within the preceding seven years, the person was convicted under

this section or AS

11.46.365

;

former AS 11.46.482(a)(4) or (5);

former AS

11.46.484(a)(2)

;

AS

11.46.120

—

11.46.140

of an offense involving the theft of a propelled vehicle; or

a law or ordinance of this or another jurisdiction with elements substantially similar to those of an offense described in (A) — (D) of this paragraph.

In this section,

“aircraft” has the meaning given in AS

02.15.260

;

“all-terrain vehicle” means a propelled vehicle that has three or more wheels or two or more tracks or treads, is less than 75 inches in width, has a dry weight of 800 pounds or less, is equipped with low pressure tires or rubberized or metal tracks or treads, and is designed primarily for travel over unimproved terrain;

“motorcycle” means a vehicle having a seat or saddle for the use of the rider, designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, and having an engine with more than 50 cubic centimeters of displacement; “motorcycle” does not include a tractor or an “all-terrain vehicle”;

“watercraft” means a propelled vehicle used or capable of being used as a means of transportation, for recreational or commercial purposes, on water; in this paragraph, “watercraft” does not include a shallow draft propelled vehicle not more than 12 feet in length with an inboard motor powering a water jet pump as its primary means of propulsion that is designed to carry not more than two persons who sit, stand, or kneel on the vehicle.

Vehicle theft in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 71 SLA 1996; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 71 SLA 2001; am § 13 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 15 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 9 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 25 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 185(a)(10), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 75(a)(8), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a)(2) and (3) ), inserted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” following “amount” and substituted “$1,000” for “$750”.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (a)(2)(A) and (B), substituted “$750” for “$1,000”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “in a total amount” in (a)(2)(A) and (a)(2)(B).

Editor's notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (a) as amended by sec. 13, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.46.365.
Vehicle theft in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of vehicle theft in the second degree if, having no right to do so or a reasonable ground to believe the person has such a right,

the person drives, tows away, or takes the propelled vehicle of another, other than a vehicle described in AS

11.46.360(a)(1)

; or

having custody of a propelled vehicle under a written agreement with the owner of the vehicle that includes an agreement to return the vehicle to the owner at a specified time, the person knowingly retains or withholds possession of the vehicle without the consent of the owner for so long a period beyond the time specified as to render the retention or possession of the vehicle an unreasonable deviation from the agreement.

Vehicle theft in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 71 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.46.370.
Possession of motor vehicle theft tools.

A person commits the crime of possession of motor vehicle theft tools if the person possesses a motor vehicle theft tool with intent to use or permit use of the tool in the commission of theft of a vehicle or contents of a vehicle.

In this section,

“altered or shaved key” means a key altered by cutting, filing, or other means to fit multiple vehicles or vehicles other than vehicles for which the key was originally manufactured;

“motor vehicle theft tool” includes a slim jim, master key, altered or shaved key, trial or jiggler key, lock puller, electronic unlocking device, or similar device adapted or designed for use in committing vehicle theft;

“trial or jiggler key” means a key designed or altered to manipulate a vehicle locking mechanism other than the lock for which the key was originally manufactured.

Possession of motor vehicle theft tools is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 26 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effective dates. —

Section 150,
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019 makes this section effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 addition of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”